Nevada, session 83, SB391.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 111 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 4, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2:
(a) The total aggregate number of units of residential real
property in this State that may be purchased in any 1 calendar
year by corporations, limited-liability companies and affiliates of
such entities must not exceed 100 units.
(b) A corporation, limited-liability company or affiliate of such
an entity shall not purchase any unit of residential real property in
this State if, as a result of the purchase, the total aggregate
number of units of residential real property purchased in this State
during the current calendar year by corporations, limited-liability
companies and affiliates of such entities would exceed 100 units.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to:
-
*SB391_R1*

– 3 –
(a) The intracorporate sale or transfer of units of residential
real property;
(b) The sale of newly constructed units of residential real
property;
(c) The sale of a mobile home or manufactured home; or
(d) The sale of an apartment building.
3. The Securities Division of the Office of the Secretary of
State shall create and maintain a registry of corporations, limited-
liability companies and affiliates of such entities that purchase or
own residential real property in this State. The Securities Division
shall make the registry available on the Internet website of the
Office of the Secretary of State.
4. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, a
corporation, limited-liability company or affiliate of such an entity
must register with the Securities Division of the Office of the
Secretary of State each time before the entity purchases any unit
of residential real property in this State. The requirement to
register does not apply to a corporation, limited-liability company
or affiliate of such an entity that owns less than 10 units of
residential real property in this State.
5. The Secretary of State shall issue a certificate of
registration to each corporation, limited-liability company or
affiliate of such an entity that registers pursuant to this section.
6. The Secretary of State may charge a fee to each
corporation, limited-liability company or affiliate of such an entity
that registers with the Securities Division pursuant to subsection 4.
7. The Secretary of State shall adopt any regulations
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.
8. As used in this section:
(a) “Corporation” does not include:
(1) A family trust company, as defined in NRS 669.042.
(2) A housing authority, as defined in NRS 315.021.
(b) “Limited-liability company” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS 86.061.
(c) “Manufactured home” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 489.113.
(d) “Mobile home” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 489.120.
Sec. 3. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 3.5. 1. The Attorney General, upon the request of the
Secretary of State, may bring an action in any court of competent
jurisdiction against an entity that violates or proposes to violate
the provisions of section 2 of this act to obtain an injunction or
other equitable relief appropriate to ensure compliance with or
enforce the provisions of section 2.
-
*SB391_R1*

– 4 –
2. The provisions of this section do not abrogate or limit the
right of any person to bring any civil action pursuant to any other
statute or the common law.
Sec. 4. The Secretary of State shall adopt regulations
establishing requirements for the form and contents of any
instrument that creates a life estate.
Sec. 5. NRS 111.312 is hereby amended to read as follows:
111.312 1. The county recorder shall not record with respect
to real property, a notice of completion, a declaration of homestead,
a restrictive covenant modification form, a restrictive covenant
modification document, a lien or notice of lien, an affidavit of death,
a mortgage or deed of trust, any conveyance of real property or
instrument in writing setting forth an agreement to convey real
property or a notice pursuant to NRS 111.3655 unless the document
being recorded contains:
(a) The mailing address of the grantee or, if there is no grantee,
the mailing address of the person who is requesting the recording of
the document; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, the assessor’s
parcel number of the property at the top left corner of the first page
of the document, if the county assessor has assigned a parcel
number to the property. The parcel number must comply with the
current system for numbering parcels used by the county assessor’s
office. The county recorder is not required to verify that the
assessor’s parcel number is correct.
2. Any document relating exclusively to the transfer of water
rights may be recorded without containing the assessor’s parcel
number of the property.
3. The county recorder shall not record with respect to real
property any deed, including, without limitation:
(a) A grant, bargain and sale deed;
(b) Quitclaim deed;
(c) Warranty deed; or
(d) Trustee’s deed upon sale,
 unless the document being recorded contains the name and
address of the person to whom a statement of the taxes assessed on
the real property is to be mailed.
4. The assessor’s parcel number shall not be deemed to be a
complete legal description of the real property conveyed.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 6, if a document
that is being recorded includes a legal description of real property
that is provided in metes and bounds, the document must include the
name and mailing address of the person who prepared the legal
description. The county recorder is not required to verify the
accuracy of the name and mailing address of such a person.
-
*SB391_R1*

– 5 –
6. If a document including the same legal description described
in subsection 5 previously has been recorded, the document must
include all information necessary to identify and locate the previous
recording, but the name and mailing address of the person who
prepared the legal description is not required for the document to be
recorded. The county recorder is not required to verify the accuracy
of the information concerning the previous recording.
7. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 10, if a
corporation, limited-liability company or affiliate of such an entity
purchases a unit of residential real property, the county recorder
shall not record the deed unless the corporation, limited-liability
company or affiliate of such an entity submits to the county
recorder for recording, concurrently with the deed to be recorded,
a copy of the certificate of registration issued by the Secretary of
State pursuant to section 2 of this act for that purchase and the
name of the corporation, limited-liability company or affiliate of
such an entity on the deed matches the name on the certificate of
registration accompanying the deed.
8. If a document is an instrument that creates a life estate, the
county recorder shall not record the document unless the
document satisfies the requirements established by the Secretary
of State pursuant to section 4 of this act.
9. The county recorder shall provide to the Secretary of State,
upon request, any information collected by the county recorder
relating to the provisions of subsection 7 that the Secretary of
State deems necessary to determine whether the purchase of a unit
of residential real property by a corporation, limited-liability
company or affiliate of such an entity complies with the provisions
of section 2 of this act and the regulations adopted pursuant
thereto.
10. The provisions of subsection 7 do not apply to a
corporation, limited-liability company or affiliate of such an entity
that owns less than 10 units of residential real property in this
State.
11. As used in this section, the terms “corporation” and
“limited-liability company” have the meanings ascribed to them in
section 2 of this act.
Sec. 6. 1. There is hereby appropriated from the State
General Fund to the Office of the Secretary of State for the costs of
personnel, travel, operating, equipment, information services and
contractors to carry out the provisions of section 2 of this act the
following sums:
For the Fiscal Year 2025-2026 .................................. $476,004
For the Fiscal Year 2026-2027 .................................... $81,705
-
*SB391_R1*

– 6 –
2. Any balance of the sums appropriated by subsection 1
remaining at the end of the respective fiscal years must not be
committed for expenditure after June 30 of the respective fiscal
years by the entity to which the appropriation is made or any entity
to which money from the appropriation is granted or otherwise
transferred in any manner, and any portion of the appropriated
money remaining must not be spent for any purpose after
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively, by
either the entity to which the money was appropriated or the entity
to which the money was subsequently granted or transferred, and
must be reverted to the State General Fund on or before
September 18, 2026, and September 17, 2027, respectively.
Sec. 7. 1. This section and section 6 of this act become
effective on July 1, 2025.
2. Sections 1 to 5, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purposes of adopting
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB391_R1*